Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.380

Dealer's license to distribute seeds.

(1) No person may distribute seeds without having obtained a dealer's license for each regular place of business. However, a license is not required of a person who distributes seeds only in sealed packages of eight ounces or less, packed by a seed labeling registrant and bearing the name and address of the registrant. Moreover, a license is not required of any grower selling seeds of his or her own production exclusively. Such seed sold by such grower must be properly labeled as provided in this chapter. Each dealer's license costs one hundred twenty-five dollars, must be issued through the business license [licensing] system, must bear the date of issue, must expire on the business licensing [license] expiration date, and must be prominently displayed in each place of business.

(2) Persons custom conditioning and/or custom treating seeds for others for remuneration are considered dealers for the purpose of this chapter.

(3) Application for a license to distribute seed must be through the business licensing system and must include the name and address of the person applying for the license, the name of a person domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service or legal notices of all kinds, and any other reasonable and practical information prescribed by the department necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 2013 c 144 s 6; 2012 c 61 s 1; 2010 c 8 s 6064; 1982 c 182 s 24; 1981 c 297 s 15; 1969 c 63 s 38.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.

Business licensing system to include additional licenses: RCW 19.02.110.